Missouri, session 2026, SB1775.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 565.056, RSMo, is repealed and seven
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
191.1903, 191.1906, 191.1909, 191.1912, 191.1915, 197.708, and
565.056, to read as follows:
191.1903. As used in sections 191.1903 to 191.1915,
the following terms mean:
(1) "Committee", the workplace violence prevention
committee or other committee responsible for developing a
facility's workplace violence prevention plan under section
191.1906;
(2) "Facility", any hospital, as defined in section
197.020;
(3) "Health care professional", a physician or other
health care practitioner licensed, accredited, or certified
by this state to perform specified health services
consistent with state law, including an emergency medical
responder as defined in section 190.100.
191.1906. 1. Each facility shall establish a
workplace violence prevention committee or authorize an
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1775 2
existing facility committee to develop the workplace
violence prevention plan required under section 191.1909.
2. The committee shall include at least:
(1) One registered nurse who provides direct care to
patients of the facility;
(2) One physician licensed to practice medicine in
this state who provides direct care to patients of the
facility; and
(3) One facility employee who provides security
services for the facility, if any and if practicable.
3. A health care system that owns or operates more
than one facility may establish a single committee for all
of the system's facilities if:
(1) The committee develops a violence prevention plan
for implementation at each facility in the system; and
(2) Data related to violence prevention remains
distinctly identifiable for each facility in the system.
191.1909. 1. A facility shall adopt and enforce a
written workplace violence prevention plan in accordance
with this section to protect health care professionals and
employees from violent behavior and threats of violent
behavior occurring at the facility. The facility shall
provide significant consideration to the violence prevention
plan recommended by the facility's committee under section
191.1906 and shall evaluate any existing facility violence
prevention plan.
2. A facility's workplace violence prevention plan
shall:
(1) Be based on the practice setting;
(2) Encourage health care professionals and employees
of the facility to provide confidential information on
workplace violence to the committee;

SB 1775 3
(3) Include a process to protect from retaliation
facility health care professionals and employees who provide
information to the committee;
(4) Adopt a definition of workplace violence that
includes:
(a) An act or threat of physical force against a
health care professional or employee that results in, or is
likely to result in, physical injury or psychological
trauma; and
(b) An incident involving the use of a firearm or
other dangerous weapon, regardless of whether a health care
professional or employee is injured by the weapon;
(5) Require the facility to offer at least annually
workplace violence prevention training or education that may
be included in required training or education provided to
the facility's health care professionals and employees who
provide direct patient care;
(6) Prescribe a system for responding to and
investigating violent incidents or potentially violent
incidents at the facility;
(7) Address physical safety and security;
(8) Require the facility to solicit information from
health care professionals and employees when developing and
implementing a workplace violence prevention plan;
(9) Allow health care professionals and employees to
report incidents of workplace violence through the
facility's existing occurrence reporting systems; and
(10) Require the facility to adjust patient care
assignments, to the extent practicable, to prevent a health
care professional or employee of the facility from treating
or providing services to a patient who has intentionally

SB 1775 4
physically abused or threatened the health care professional
or employee.
3. The written workplace violence prevention plan may
satisfy the requirements of subsection 2 of this section by
referencing other internal facility policies and documents.
4. At least annually, a committee shall review and
evaluate the workplace violence prevention plan and report
the results of the evaluation to the governing body of the
facility.
5. Each facility shall make available on request an
electronic or printed copy of the facility's workplace
violence prevention plan to each health care professional or
employee of the facility. If the facility or the committee
determines the plan contains information that would pose a
security threat if made public, the facility may redact that
information before providing the plan.
191.1912. 1. Following an incident of workplace
violence, a facility shall, at a minimum, offer immediate
postincident services, including any necessary acute medical
treatment for each health care professional or employee of
the facility who is directly involved in the incident.
2. No facility shall discourage a health care
professional or employee from exercising the health care
professional's or employee's right to contact or file a
report with law enforcement regarding an incident of
workplace violence.
3. No person shall discipline, including by suspension
or termination of employment, discriminate against, or
retaliate against another person who:
(1) In good faith reports an incident of workplace
violence; or

SB 1775 5
(2) Advises a health care professional or employee of
the health care professional's or employee's right to report
an incident of workplace violence.
191.1915. 1. An agency with jurisdiction over the
license of a facility or health care professional may take
disciplinary action against any person who violates the
provisions of sections 191.1903 to 191.1915 as if the person
violated an applicable licensing law.
2. A facility or health care professional
participating in good faith in complying with the provisions
of sections 191.1903 to 191.1915 and a workplace violence
prevention plan adopted under section 191.1909 shall be
immune from any liability, civil or criminal, that may
otherwise be incurred or imposed.
197.708. Each hospital shall display in a prominent
place within the waiting rooms of the emergency department
and the labor and delivery department a printed sign with
the following text in all capital letters: "WARNING:
ASSAULTING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WHO IS ENGAGED IN THE
PERFORMANCE OF HIS OR HER OFFICIAL DUTIES, INCLUDING
STRIKING A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL WITH ANY BODILY FLUID,
IS A SERIOUS CRIME AND WILL BE PROSECUTED TO THE FULLEST
EXTENT OF THE LAW.".
565.056. 1. A person commits the offense of assault
in the fourth degree if:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes
physical injury, physical pain, or illness to another person;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes
physical injury to another person by means of a firearm;
(3) The person purposely places another person in
apprehension of immediate physical injury;

SB 1775 6
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which
creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical
injury to another person;
(5) The person knowingly causes or attempts to cause
physical contact with a person with a disability, which a
reasonable person, who does not have a disability, would
consider offensive or provocative; [or]
(6) The person knowingly causes physical contact with
another person knowing the other person will regard the
contact as offensive or provocative; or
(7) The person knowingly causes physical pain to a
special victim as that term is defined in section 565.002.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
assault in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.
3. Violation of the provisions of subdivision (3) or
(6) of subsection 1 of this section is a class C misdemeanor
unless the victim is a special victim, as the term "special
victim" is defined under section 565.002, in which case a
violation of such provisions is a class A misdemeanor.
Violation of the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection
1 of this section is a class A misdemeanor unless the person
has previously been found guilty or pled guilty to an
assault offense as defined under section 565.079 or an
assault in violation of a county or municipal ordinance, in
which case the offense is a class E felony. A person who
has previously been found guilty or pled guilty to an
assault offense on two or more occasions and who violates
the provisions of subdivision (7) of subsection 1 of this
section shall be guilty of a class D felony.
4. A person found guilty of a violation of subdivision
(7) of subsection 1 of this section shall not be sentenced
to a fine and shall not be eligible for probation or parole

SB 1775 7
until the person has served a minimum of six months of
incarceration for a first offense or one year of
incarceration for a second or subsequent offense.
✓